Utah statutes.
39-6-85.   Releasing prisoner without proper authority -- Allowing escape.

A person subject to this chapter who, without authority, releases any prisoner committed to his charge, or who through neglect or design allows the prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a military court directs, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

